District of Columbia statutes.
29-710.03

Action on plan of merger by constituent limited partnership.

(a)

Subject to § 29-710.06, a plan of merger shall be consented to by all the partners of a constituent limited partnership.

(b)

Subject to § 29-710.06 and any contractual rights, after a merger is approved, and at any time before a filing is made under § 29-710.04, a constituent limited partnership may amend the plan or abandon the planned merger:

(1)

As provided in the plan; and

(2)

Except as prohibited by the plan, with the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-710.02.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1107 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).